Hawaii statutes.
§309-3 Capacity of minors. Any student
otherwise qualifying for a loan under the provisions of this chapter shall not
be disqualified by reasons of the student's being under the age of eighteen
years, and for the purpose of applying for, receiving and repaying such loan,
any such person shall be deemed to have full legal capacity to act and shall
have all rights, powers, privileges, and obligations of an adult, with respect
thereto. [L 1963, c 90, pt of §1; Supp, §44B-3; am L 1966, c 16, pt of §2; HRS §309-3;
am L 1968, c 49, pt of §2; am L 1972, c 2, §9; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next